Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1632.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1205.9. Human Trafficking Awareness and Prevention.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall develop a continuing professional education program on human trafficking awareness and prevention, in consultation with the following entities:(1) The Office of Attorney General.(2) The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency's Office of Victims' Services.(3) A human trafficking organization.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The program shall address, at a minimum, the following topics:(1) Current Federal and State laws relating to human trafficking.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police Human Trafficking Hotline at 1-888-292-1919 or its successor telephone number.(3) Facts and statistics relating to human trafficking in this Commonwealth and throughout the United States.(4) Methods by which human traffickers compel or coerce victims to engage in involuntary servitude, including the recruitment of potential victims over social media platforms and the Internet.(5) Risk factors that may make an individual more vulnerable to human trafficking.(6) How to identify potential victims of sexual servitude and involuntary servitude and what to do when a victim is identified.(c) The program:(1) May be provided through the Internet or other electronic means.(2) Shall be at least one (1) hour in duration.(3) Shall be included in the database under section 1502-L(a)(2).(d) (1) A professional educator who is required to undergo continuing professional education under section 1205.2 shall be required to complete the program under this section.(2) Upon completion of the program, a professional educator shall receive credit toward the professional educator's continuing professional education requirement.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250HB1632PN1982 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Human trafficking." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions)."Human trafficking organization." A nonprofit organization that specializes in outreach and education programs on human trafficking."Involuntary servitude." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001."Professional educator." As defined in section 1205.2(o)."Program." The continuing professional education program on human trafficking awareness and prevention, which is developed in accordance with subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1632PN1982 - 3 - 123456789101112131415